New Jersey, session 222, A4298.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 8 of P.L.1968, c.142 (C.18A:71-35) is amended to read as follows: 8.    (a)  No opportunity grant shall be awarded to any applicant therefor unless such applicant shall have demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that he or she: (1)   Is and has been a resident of the State for at least 12 months prior to receiving the grant; (2)   Will be or is attending a full-time or other program leading to a degree, or other organized program of study approved by the institution which he or she is or will be attending; (3)   Has demonstrated financial need for such grant, as determined by standards and procedures to be established by the board, in accordance with the provisions of this and the preceding article; and (4)   Has complied with all rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this act by the board for the award, regulation and administration of opportunity grants. (b)   In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the board is hereby authorized to require the satisfaction of such other requirements as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. (c)  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a student enrolling at an institution of higher education who has previously earned an associate degree or college credits or who has participated in or completed a dual degree program while enrolled in high school, in addition to meeting the eligibility requirements established pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall be eligible for an opportunity grant. (cf: P.L.1968, c.142, s.8) 2. (New section) A student who has previously earned an associate degree or college credits or who has participated in or completed a dual degree program while enrolled in high school, and who is otherwise eligible to participate, shall not be excluded from participating in a campus-based Educational Opportunity Fund program at any institution of higher education. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year next following the date of enactment.